Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
658G]

HAWAII
UNIFORM COLLABORATIVE LAW ACT

Section

658G-1 Short title

658G-2 Definitions

658G-3 Applicability

658G-4 Collaborative law participation
agreement;

requirements

658G-5 Beginning and concluding a collaborative
law process

658G-6 Proceedings pending before tribunal;
status report

658G-7 Emergency order

658G-8 Approval of agreement by tribunal

658G-9 Disqualification of collaborative lawyer
and lawyers

in associated law firm

658G-10 Low income parties

658G-11 Governmental entity as party

658G-12 Disclosure of information

658G-13 Standards of professional responsibility
and

mandatory reporting not affected

658G-14 Appropriateness of collaborative law
process

658G-15 Coercive or violent relationship

658G-16 Confidentiality of collaborative law communication

658G-17 Privilege against disclosure for
collaborative law

communication; admissibility; discovery

658G-18 Waiver and preclusion of privilege

658G-19 Limits of privilege

658G-20 Authority of tribunal in case of
noncompliance

658G-21 Uniformity of application and
construction

658G-22 Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global
and

National Commerce Act

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next